Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2311
Rules and regulations.

The board of examiners may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 11, p. 668;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 14.